Washington statutes.
RCW 15.88.050

Appointment of members—Travel expenses.

(1) The director shall appoint the members of the commission. In making such appointments, the director shall take into consideration recommendations made by the growers' association and the wine institute as the persons recommended for appointment as members of the commission. In appointing persons to the commission, the director shall seek to ensure as nearly as possible a balanced representation on the commission which would reflect the composition of the growers and wine producers throughout the state as to number of acres cultivated and amount of wine produced.

(2) The appointment shall be carried out immediately subsequent to July 1, 1987, and members so appointed as set forth in this chapter shall serve for the periods set forth for the original members of the commission under RCW 15.88.040.

(3) In the event a position on the commission becomes vacant due to resignation, disqualification, death, or for any other reason, the unexpired term of the position shall immediately be filled by appointment by the director.

(4) Each member or employee of the commission shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter as defined by the commission in rule. Otherwise if not defined in rule, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the rates allowed by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2003 c 396 s 40; 2002 c 313 s 111; 1987 c 452 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.